Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
EXEMPTIONS

A.
Generally

Note

Sections 651-61 to 64 designated as subpart A by L 1976, c
137, §6.

Rules of Court

See HRCP rules 64, 69; DCRCP rules 64, 69.

§651-61 Exemption, how claimed. Where
an officer is about to levy an attachment or execution on personal property,
some of which is claimed as exempt, the officer shall demand of the defendant
in writing that the defendant make selection of such property as is exempt to
the defendant and in reference to which the defendant has the right of
selection and the defendant shall then and there make the defendant's
selection; or, failing so to do, the officer shall make it for the defendant,
and any selection so made shall be conclusive on the defendant. [L 1901, c 9,
§11; RL 1925, §2455; RL 1935, §4156; RL 1945, §10183; RL 1955, §233-60; HRS
§651-61; am L 1978, c 46, §1; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Not necessary for execution or attachment defendant to make
claim of exemption for property specifically exempt. 23 H. 584.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next